Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
District Court Settlements

395.600.
District Court settlements.

The District Court shall make settlements with personal representatives, assignees, conservators, curators, and guardians in his county.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 368, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 12, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 111, effective July 1, 1982; 2014, ch. 25, § 115, effective July 15, 2014.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since the District Court has exclusive jurisdiction of uncontested probate matters, any papers relative to an uncontested estate in which no final settlement was filed prior to January 2, 1978, should be transferred to the clerk of the District Court of that county and duplicates should be filed with the county clerk.

OAG 78-68

.

395.605.
When informal settlement may be accepted from fiduciary.

Upon the sworn application of any fiduciary, that the fiduciary is the sole beneficiary of any estate, the court may dispense with the requirements of this chapter regarding periodic or final settlement of fiduciaries’ accounts and may dispense with the requirements of a surety for the fiduciary and shall accept from the fiduciary an informal settlement. The informal settlement shall be made, under oath, by the fiduciary and shall state that the estate was solvent; that all legal claims and debts have been paid, or if not paid, the manner in which the claims and debts have been provided for; that, for final settlement, the requirements of the inheritance, estate or similar death statutes have been met and the tax paid, if due and payable; that all court costs have been paid; the name of the attorney(s), if any, representing the fiduciary, and the amount of the attorney’s fee, and that the beneficiary has received his or her share. An informal settlement may be filed at any time after expiration of six (6) months from the fiduciary’s appointment. Upon the filing of the informal final settlement, the court may enter an order discharging the fiduciary, and his or her surety, if any. When a settlement is effected in the informal manner, no notice to any person shall be required nor shall the court be compelled to inquire into detailed items of income or disbursements.

If a proposed periodic or final settlement of a fiduciary is accompanied by a verified waiver executed by all of the beneficiaries of an estate, and none of the beneficiaries is under a disability, the court shall accept from the fiduciary an informal settlement which meets the requirements of subsection (1) of this section. Said beneficiaries may request an accounting of the assets of the estate prior to execution of the waiver. No verified waiver need be obtained from a nonresiduary legatee who has received and receipted for his or her legacy, the canceled check or signed receipt attached to the proposed settlement being sufficient evidence of satisfaction. The court may require the fiduciary to execute bond with or without surety to insure the application of the estate assets to the debts of the decedent.

In the event that one (1) or more of the beneficiaries of the estate is under a disability, the court may allow the filing of an informal settlement if the court is of the opinion that the best interests of the person under the disability would be served.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 369, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 24, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 90, § 31, effective July 15, 1988; 2000, ch. 151, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 362, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2012, ch. 60, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2013, ch. 127, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Under the express language of subsection (1) of this section requiring a fiduciary to attach a duplicate or photocopy of tax releases “if available,” the District Court has no authority to require, as a condition precedent, the attaching of the tax releases to the application. The court can only require the fiduciary to either attach the tax releases, if available, or, if not available, to so state in his or her application for informal settlement.

OAG 83-173

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Ratliff, Kentucky Probate — A Simple Overview, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 16.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Affidavit for Informal Settlement (Jefferson County), Form 233.28.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Affidavit of Waiver of Formal Settlement (AOC 851), Form 233.19.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Fiduciary Bond (AOC 825), Form 233.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Informal Final Settlement: Affidavit, Motion, and Order (AOC 850), Form 233.18.

395.610.
Periodic accounting by fiduciaries.

Two (2) years after appointment and annually thereafter, unless otherwise provided by law, every fiduciary as defined in KRS

395.001

, other than a guardian or conservator of a mentally disabled person, shall render an account of the execution of his trust to the court by which he was appointed, including in the account an itemized statement of receipts and disbursements supported by vouchers accompanying the account and a statement of all investments on hand and changes in investments since the filing of his last account. The settlements, when approved and confirmed by the court, shall be recorded and indexed by the clerk, and the original and the vouchers carefully kept by him in his office. An account shall be rendered by a fiduciary, at any other time upon order of the court upon its own motion or that of any person interested in the trust, for good cause shown on affidavit. At the expiration of his trust, the fiduciary shall fully account for and pay over the trust estate to the person or persons entitled thereto. Every such account shall list all unpaid creditors whose claims have been allowed and all creditors whose claims have been disallowed. No account of a fiduciary, except of corporate fiduciaries under the supervision of state or federal banking authorities, shall be approved until there are exhibited to the court, for its examination, the security or securities shown in the account as being in the hands of the fiduciary, or the certificate of a bank having possession thereof or in which they have been deposited for safekeeping, and a certified bank statement showing the funds to the credit of the trust.

Guardians and conservators of mentally disabled persons may be required to render accountings to the court under the provisions of this section. Guardians and conservators of mentally disabled persons shall comply with the reporting requirements of KRS Chapter 387.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 370, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 326, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 25, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 141, § 112, effective July 1, 1982; 1990, ch. 487, § 23, effective July 13, 1990; 2007, ch. 82, § 1, effective June 26, 2007; 2014, ch. 25, § 116, effective July 15, 2014.

395.615.
Evidence — How produced — Allowances to be supported by facts.

The District Court may hear evidence for or against any item, and may question fiduciaries, under oath, about any matter connected with the settlement. Witnesses may be summoned at the instance of either party to give evidence when the settlement is made, or upon the trial of exceptions thereto, and their attendance may be coerced as in other cases. All oral evidence shall be electronically recorded and no evidence shall be presumed to have been heard unless it has been so recorded. No credit shall be allowed a fiduciary for disbursements, fees or services without legal evidence to justify it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 371, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 12, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

395.617.
Proposed settlement.

A fiduciary may, prior to filing a periodic or final settlement and prior to a distribution of assets, file with the court a proposed settlement. The proposed settlement shall be set for hearing and notice given as for any other settlement except that beneficiaries of the estate, other than nonresiduary legatees who have received and receipted for their legacies, shall also receive notice from the fiduciary by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least twenty (20) days prior to the hearing date. The proposed settlement shall set forth all assets and disbursements previously made, shall indicate assets on hand and anticipated to be received subsequent to the date of the proposed settlement and prior to the filing of the periodic or final settlement, and shall further indicate the manner in which the remaining and anticipated assets are proposed to be distributed. The proposal may set forth which assets are to be distributed in kind and to whom and which assets may be liquidated for distribution of cash or for payment of debts, costs of administration, or pecuniary legacies. The proposal may also indicate claims proposed to be allowed or disallowed, in whole or in part, and may also indicate fees and commissions proposed to be paid to the fiduciary and his attorney. The inclusion of evidence and vouchers to accompany the proposal shall not be necessary unless required by the court upon exceptions filed. At the hearing, if no exceptions are filed, the proposal, if made according to law, shall be approved. If exceptions are filed, other evidence besides that reported may be heard, and the court shall, upon the whole case, reject, confirm, alter, or amend the proposal. Following the entry of an order of approval or of an order of amendment, the fiduciary shall disburse the assets in accordance therewith. Following the distribution, the fiduciary shall file a settlement accompanied by evidence and vouchers showing that distribution was effected in conformity with the court order. If it appears to the court that the distribution was in conformity, the court shall confirm the settlement and, if the settlement is final, discharge the fiduciary and his surety without further hearing or notice to any person.

An aggrieved party may, no later than thirty (30) days from the entry of the order upon the proposed settlement, institute an adversary proceeding in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 24A.120(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 218, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 517, § 11, effective September 1, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/24/2003). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has changed a reference in subsection (2) of this section from “KRS 24A.120(1)(b)” to “KRS 24A.120(2).”

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Calvert, Probate Law, 21 N. Ky. L. Rev. 367 (1994).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion of Executor for Discharge, Form 234.12.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Proposed Final Settlement and Order, Form 233.25.

395.620.
Report and filing of settlement.

The District Judge shall make a written report of the settlement, showing each item of debit and credit, and the general result, and return it, with all evidence heard and vouchers filed, to the Circuit Clerk. The clerk shall note it of record, and indorse on it the time of filing, and set a date for a hearing on the report.

A hearing on a settlement filed in conformity with an approved proposed settlement made under KRS

395.617

shall not be necessary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 372, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 12, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1992, ch. 218, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Ratliff, Kentucky Probate — A Simple Overview, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 16.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Calvert, Probate Law, 21 N. Ky. L. Rev. 367 (1994).

395.625.
Notice requirements for filing of settlement — Exception.

Not less than ten (10) days prior to the date of hearing, the clerk shall cause notice of the filing of a settlement to be published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424, stating the name of the fiduciary, the trust, the nature of the account and the date of hearing, with a statement that exceptions must be filed before that time; except that with the court’s approval the fiduciary may, in lieu of such publication, send a written notice thereof to all unpaid creditors and distributees, which notice shall be mailed at least ten (10) days before said date of hearing. The fiduciary in such cases shall file his affidavit that such notice has been mailed. The actual cost of the notice, or the proportionate part thereof, if more than one (1) settlement, shall be taxed as costs. If the value of the trust or estate is not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) and the assets of the trust or estate are held in an account that may be accessed only upon order of the court, the provisions of this section shall not apply to settlements involving that trust or estate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 373, effective January 2, 1978; 2001, ch. 21, § 1, effective June 21, 2001.

Opinions of Attorney General.

It is the responsibility of the District Court clerk to advertise a final settlement, except that with the court’s approval the fiduciary may, in lieu of such publication, send a written notice thereof to all unpaid creditors and distributees, which notice shall be mailed at least 10 days before the date of the hearing.

OAG 78-147

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Ratliff, Kentucky Probate — A Simple Overview, Volume 54, No. 1, Winter 1990 Ky. Bench & B. 16.

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Final Settlement and Order, Form 233.17.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Final Settlement and Order Following Proposed Final Settlement, Form 233.26.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Motion of Executor for Discharge, Form 234.12.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Discharging Administrator, Form 234.14.

395.630.
Exceptions — Confirmation — Recording — Effect as evidence.

At the hearing, if no exceptions are filed, the report, if made according to law, shall be approved and recorded. If exceptions are filed, other evidence besides that reported may be heard, and the court shall upon the whole case, reject, confirm, alter or amend the report, and, if confirmed, order it to be recorded. The vouchers accompanying the report shall not be recorded, but must be carefully kept on file with the report in the clerk’s office. Any new evidence given in court must be electronically recorded and filed with the report. Settlements so made and recorded shall be prima facie evidence between the parties interested.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 374, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Confirming Periodic/Final Settlement of Guardian, Form 261.10.

395.635.
Certification of list of fiduciaries delinquent in accounting — Notice — Fees.

It shall be the duty of the clerk to report in writing to the judge once each month the names and addresses of all fiduciaries who have during the previous calendar month become delinquent in filing an inventory or settlement. The judge shall notify by mail such delinquent fiduciaries and shall warn them of the penalties provided by law. If the clerk shall fail to report such delinquents it shall be the duty of the judge to secure a list of same from the court records. There shall be assessed against each delinquent fiduciary a fee of one dollar ($1) for the preparation of said list and the mailing of said notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 375, effective January 2, 1978.

395.640.
Sureties of fiduciaries, inquiry into solvency of — Additional surety.

The district judge shall at least once each year carefully inquire into the solvency of all the sureties upon the bond of each fiduciary, and if there is reason to believe that any bond is not amply sufficient to protect those interested, he shall at once give notice to the fiduciary that a new bond, or additional surety on the old one, is required, and upon the failure of the fiduciary to give the required bond or surety within a reasonable time fixed by the court, the court shall remove him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 376, effective January 2, 1978.

395.645.
Clerk to record settlements and reports.

When the court directs, settlements of the accounts of fiduciaries made before and reported by any trial commissioner, and all reports of estates or funds received or disbursed, under order of the court, by its trial commissioner, after they have been confirmed by the court, shall be recorded by the clerk of the court in a book to be provided for that purpose. The vouchers accompanying the settlements or reports shall not be recorded.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 377, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 12, § 4, effective June 17, 1978.

395.650.
Circuit clerk to file certificate of settlement.

Where fiduciaries appointed in the District Court are required to make settlement in the Circuit Court, the circuit clerk shall make and file a certificate of each approved settlement, showing the number and style of the case, the number of the file box in which the suit may be found in the circuit clerk’s office, before whom made, when approved by the court and whether it is a final or partial settlement.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 378, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 12, § 5, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by Acts 1978, ch. 12, § 5 and 1978, ch. 384, § 116 which conflict and cannot be compiled together. Chapter 12 prevails over ch. 384 (Reviser’s bill) and thus the section is compiled as amended by chapter 12. See KRS 7.136(3).

395.655.
Settlement of accounts of fiduciaries — Jurisdiction.

The accounts of committees may be settled in the same manner, and the settlements shall have the same effect, as prescribed by KRS

395.600

and

395.640

. The District Court of the county in which the committee is appointed shall have the jurisdiction of making the settlements.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 379, effective January 2, 1978; 2014, ch. 25, § 117, effective July 15, 2014.

395.657.
Trial commissioner may make settlement.

Any duty required of the District Judge under KRS

395.600

to

395.655

may, if authorized by rules of the Supreme Court, be performed by the trial commissioner appointed pursuant to KRS

24A.100

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 12, § 6, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Periodic/Final Settlement of Guardian/Conservator for Minor/Disabled Person (AOC 856), Form 261.09.

395.660.
Compensation of special commissioner. [Repealed.]